Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2347
Nonexoneration.

A specific devise passes subject to any security interest existing at the date of death, without right of exoneration, regardless of a general directive in the will to pay debts.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 69, UPC § 2-609.